Illinois, session 104th, SB243.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Open Meetings Act is amended by changing 5Sections 1.05, 2, 2.07, and 7 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 120/1.05)7    Sec. 1.05. Training. 8    (a) Every public body shall designate employees, officers, 9or members to receive training on compliance with this Act. 10Each public body shall submit a list of designated employees, 11officers, or members to the Public Access Counselor. Within 6 12months after January 1, 2010 (the effective date of Public Act 1396-542), the designated employees, officers, and members must 14successfully complete an electronic training curriculum, 15developed and administered by the Public Access Counselor, and 16thereafter must successfully complete an annual training 17program. Thereafter, whenever a public body designates an 18additional employee, officer, or member to receive this 19training, that person must successfully complete the 20electronic training curriculum within 30 days after that 21designation.22    (b) Except as otherwise provided in this Section, each 23elected or appointed member of a public body subject to this   SB0243 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1Act who is such a member on January 1, 2012 (the effective date 2of Public Act 97-504) must successfully complete the 3electronic training curriculum developed and administered by 4the Public Access Counselor. For these members, the training 5must be completed within one year after January 1, 2012 (the 6effective date of Public Act 97-504). 7    Except as otherwise provided in this Section, each elected 8or appointed member of a public body subject to this Act who 9becomes such a member after January 1, 2012 (the effective 10date of Public Act 97-504) shall successfully complete the 11electronic training curriculum developed and administered by 12the Public Access Counselor. For these members, the training 13must be completed not later than the 90th day after the date 14the member:15        (1) takes the oath of office, if the member is 16    required to take an oath of office to assume the person's 17    duties as a member of the public body; or18        (2) otherwise assumes responsibilities as a member of 19    the public body, if the member is not required to take an 20    oath of office to assume the person's duties as a member of 21    the governmental body.22    Each member successfully completing the electronic 23training curriculum shall file a copy of the certificate of 24completion with the public body.25    Completing the required training as a member of the public 26body satisfies the requirements of this Section with regard to   SB0243 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1the member's service on a committee or subcommittee of the 2public body and the member's ex officio service on any other 3public body.4    The failure of one or more members of a public body to 5complete the training required by this Section does not affect 6the validity of an action taken by the public body.7    An elected or appointed member of a public body subject to 8this Act who has successfully completed the training required 9under this subsection (b) and filed a copy of the certificate 10of completion with the public body is not required to 11subsequently complete the training required under this 12subsection (b).13    (c) An elected school board member may satisfy the 14training requirements of this Section by participating in a 15course of training sponsored or conducted by an organization 16created under Article 23 of the School Code. The course of 17training shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in: 18        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 19    for open meetings; 20        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies; 21        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 22    notice, and record-keeping under this Act; 23        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 24    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 25    and 26        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to   SB0243 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    comply with this Act. 2    If an organization created under Article 23 of the School 3Code provides a course of training under this subsection (c), 4it must provide a certificate of course completion to each 5school board member who successfully completes that course of 6training. 7    (d) A commissioner of a drainage district may satisfy the 8training requirements of this Section by participating in a 9course of training sponsored or conducted by an organization 10that represents the drainage districts created under the 11Illinois Drainage Code. The course of training shall include, 12but not be limited to, instruction in:13        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 14    for open meetings;15        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies;16        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 17    notice, and record-keeping under this Act;18        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 19    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 20    and21        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 22    comply with this Act. 23    If an organization that represents the drainage districts 24created under the Illinois Drainage Code provides a course of 25training under this subsection (d), it must provide a 26certificate of course completion to each commissioner who   SB0243 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1successfully completes that course of training. 2    (e) A director of a soil and water conservation district 3may satisfy the training requirements of this Section by 4participating in a course of training sponsored or conducted 5by an organization that represents soil and water conservation 6districts created under the Soil and Water Conservation 7Districts Act. The course of training shall include, but not 8be limited to, instruction in:9        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 10    for open meetings;11        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies;12        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 13    notice, and record-keeping under this Act;14        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 15    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 16    and17        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 18    comply with this Act. 19    If an organization that represents the soil and water 20conservation districts created under the Soil and Water 21Conservation Districts Act provides a course of training under 22this subsection (e), it must provide a certificate of course 23completion to each director who successfully completes that 24course of training. 25    (f) An elected or appointed member of a public body of a 26park district, forest preserve district, or conservation   SB0243 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1district may satisfy the training requirements of this Section 2by participating in a course of training sponsored or 3conducted by an organization that represents the park 4districts created in the Park District Code. The course of 5training shall include, but not be limited to, instruction in:6        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 7    for open meetings;8        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies;9        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 10    notice, and record-keeping under this Act;11        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 12    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 13    and14        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 15    comply with this Act.16    If an organization that represents the park districts 17created in the Park District Code provides a course of 18training under this subsection (f), it must provide a 19certificate of course completion to each elected or appointed 20member of a public body who successfully completes that course 21of training. 22    (g) An elected or appointed member of the board of 23trustees of a fire protection district may satisfy the 24training requirements of this Section by participating in a 25course of training sponsored or conducted by an organization 26that represents fire protection districts created under the   SB0243 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1Fire Protection District Act. The course of training shall 2include, but not be limited to, instruction in:3        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 4    for open meetings;5        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies;6        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 7    notice, and record-keeping under this Act;8        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 9    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 10    and11        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 12    comply with this Act.13    If an organization that represents fire protection 14districts organized under the Fire Protection District Act 15provides a course of training under this subsection (g), it 16must provide a certificate of course completion to each 17elected or appointed member of a board of trustees who 18successfully completes that course of training. 19    (h) An elected or appointed member of a public body of a 20municipality may satisfy the training requirements of this 21Section by participating in a course of training sponsored or 22conducted by an organization that represents municipalities as 23designated in Section 1-8-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code. 24The course of training shall include, but not be limited to, 25instruction in: 26        (1) the general background of the legal requirements   SB0243 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    for open meetings; 2        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies; 3        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 4    notice, and record-keeping under this Act; 5        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 6    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 7    and 8        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 9    comply with this Act. 10    If an organization that represents municipalities as 11designated in Section 1-8-1 of the Illinois Municipal Code 12provides a course of training under this subsection (h), it 13must provide a certificate of course completion to each 14elected or appointed member of a public body who successfully 15completes that course of training. 16    (i) An elected or appointed member of a public body of a 17township may satisfy the training requirements of this Section 18by participating in a course of training sponsored or 19conducted by an organization that represents townships created 20under the Township Code. The course of training shall include, 21but shall not be limited to, instruction in:22        (1) the general background of the legal requirements 23    for open meetings;24        (2) the applicability of this Act to public bodies;25        (3) procedures and requirements regarding quorums, 26    notice, and recordkeeping under this Act;  SB0243 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        (4) procedures and requirements for holding an open 2    meeting and for holding a closed meeting under this Act; 3    and4        (5) penalties and other consequences for failing to 5    comply with this Act.6    If an organization that represents townships created under 7the Township Code provides a course of training under this 8subsection, it must provide a certificate of course completion 9to each elected or appointed member of a public body who 10successfully completes that course of training. 11(Source: P.A. 101-233, eff. 1-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 12    (5 ILCS 120/2)  (from Ch. 102, par. 42)13    Sec. 2. Open meetings. 14    (a) Openness required. All meetings of public bodies shall 15be open to the public unless excepted in subsection (c) and 16closed in accordance with Section 2a.17    (b) Construction of exceptions. The exceptions contained 18in subsection (c) are in derogation of the requirement that 19public bodies meet in the open, and therefore, the exceptions 20are to be strictly construed, extending only to subjects 21clearly within their scope. The exceptions authorize but do 22not require the holding of a closed meeting to discuss a 23subject included within an enumerated exception.24    (c) Exceptions. A public body may hold closed meetings to 25consider the following subjects:  SB0243 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        (1) The appointment, employment, compensation, 2    discipline, performance, or dismissal of specific 3    employees, specific individuals who serve as independent 4    contractors in a park, recreational, or educational 5    setting, or specific volunteers of the public body or 6    legal counsel for the public body, including hearing 7    testimony on a complaint lodged against an employee, a 8    specific individual who serves as an independent 9    contractor in a park, recreational, or educational 10    setting, or a volunteer of the public body or against 11    legal counsel for the public body to determine its 12    validity. However, a meeting to consider an increase in 13    compensation to a specific employee of a public body that 14    is subject to the Local Government Wage Increase 15    Transparency Act may not be closed and shall be open to the 16    public and posted and held in accordance with this Act.17        (2) Collective negotiating matters between the public 18    body and its employees or their representatives, or 19    deliberations concerning salary schedules for one or more 20    classes of employees.21        (3) The selection of a person to fill a public office, 22    as defined in this Act, including a vacancy in a public 23    office, when the public body is given power to appoint 24    under law or ordinance, or the discipline, performance or 25    removal of the occupant of a public office, when the 26    public body is given power to remove the occupant under   SB0243 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    law or ordinance. 2        (4) Evidence or testimony presented in open hearing, 3    or in closed hearing where specifically authorized by law, 4    to a quasi-adjudicative body, as defined in this Act, 5    provided that the body prepares and makes available for 6    public inspection a written decision setting forth its 7    determinative reasoning.8        (4.5) Evidence or testimony presented to a school 9    board regarding denial of admission to school events or 10    property pursuant to Section 24-24 of the School Code, 11    provided that the school board prepares and makes 12    available for public inspection a written decision setting 13    forth its determinative reasoning. 14        (5) The purchase or lease of real property for the use 15    of the public body, including meetings held for the 16    purpose of discussing whether a particular parcel should 17    be acquired.18        (6) The setting of a price for sale or lease of 19    property owned by the public body.20        (7) The sale or purchase of securities, investments, 21    or investment contracts. This exception shall not apply to 22    the investment of assets or income of funds deposited into 23    the Illinois Prepaid Tuition Trust Fund. 24        (8) Security procedures, school building safety and 25    security, and the use of personnel and equipment to 26    respond to an actual, a threatened, or a reasonably   SB0243 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    potential danger to the safety of employees, students, 2    staff, the public, or public property.3        (9) Student disciplinary cases.4        (10) The placement of individual students in special 5    education programs and other matters relating to 6    individual students.7        (11) Litigation, when an action against, affecting or 8    on behalf of the particular public body has been filed and 9    is pending before a court or administrative tribunal, or 10    when the public body finds that an action is probable or 11    imminent, in which case the basis for the finding shall be 12    recorded and entered into the minutes of the closed 13    meeting.14        (12) The establishment of reserves or settlement of 15    claims as provided in the Local Governmental and 16    Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, if otherwise the 17    disposition of a claim or potential claim might be 18    prejudiced, or the review or discussion of claims, loss or 19    risk management information, records, data, advice or 20    communications from or with respect to any insurer of the 21    public body or any intergovernmental risk management 22    association or self insurance pool of which the public 23    body is a member.24        (13) Conciliation of complaints of discrimination in 25    the sale or rental of housing, when closed meetings are 26    authorized by the law or ordinance prescribing fair   SB0243 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    housing practices and creating a commission or 2    administrative agency for their enforcement.3        (14) Informant sources, the hiring or assignment of 4    undercover personnel or equipment, or ongoing, prior or 5    future criminal investigations, when discussed by a public 6    body with criminal investigatory responsibilities.7        (15) Professional ethics or performance when 8    considered by an advisory body appointed to advise a 9    licensing or regulatory agency on matters germane to the 10    advisory body's field of competence.11        (16) Self evaluation, practices and procedures, or 12    professional ethics, when meeting with a representative of 13    a statewide or regional association of which the public 14    body is a member.15        (17) The recruitment, credentialing, discipline or 16    formal peer review of physicians or other health care 17    professionals, or for the discussion of matters protected 18    under the federal Patient Safety and Quality Improvement 19    Act of 2005, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 20    including 42 C.F.R. Part 3 (73 FR 70732), or the federal 21    Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 22    1996, and the regulations promulgated thereunder, 23    including 45 C.F.R. Parts 160, 162, and 164, by a 24    hospital, or other institution providing medical care, 25    that is operated by the public body.26        (18) Deliberations for decisions of the Prisoner   SB0243 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Review Board.2        (19) Review or discussion of applications received 3    under the Experimental Organ Transplantation Procedures 4    Act.5        (20) The classification and discussion of matters 6    classified as confidential or continued confidential by 7    the State Government Suggestion Award Board.8        (21) Discussion of minutes of meetings lawfully closed 9    under this Act, whether for purposes of approval by the 10    body of the minutes or semi-annual review of the minutes 11    as mandated by Section 2.06.12        (22) Deliberations for decisions of the State 13    Emergency Medical Services Disciplinary Review Board.14        (23) The operation by a municipality of a municipal 15    utility or the operation of a municipal power agency or 16    municipal natural gas agency when the discussion involves 17    (i) contracts relating to the purchase, sale, or delivery 18    of electricity or natural gas or (ii) the results or 19    conclusions of load forecast studies.20        (24) Meetings of a residential health care facility 21    resident sexual assault and death review team or the 22    Executive Council under the Abuse Prevention Review Team 23    Act.24        (25) Meetings of an independent team of experts under 25    Brian's Law. 26        (26) Meetings of a mortality review team appointed   SB0243 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    under the Department of Juvenile Justice Mortality Review 2    Team Act. 3        (27) (Blank). 4        (28) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 5    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 6    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 7    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 8        (29) Meetings between internal or external auditors 9    and governmental audit committees, finance committees, and 10    their equivalents, when the discussion involves internal 11    control weaknesses, identification of potential fraud risk 12    areas, known or suspected frauds, and fraud interviews 13    conducted in accordance with generally accepted auditing 14    standards of the United States of America.15        (30) (Blank). 16        (31) Meetings and deliberations for decisions of the 17    Concealed Carry Licensing Review Board under the Firearm 18    Concealed Carry Act. 19        (32) Meetings between the Regional Transportation 20    Authority Board and its Service Boards when the discussion 21    involves review by the Regional Transportation Authority 22    Board of employment contracts under Section 28d of the 23    Metropolitan Transit Authority Act and Sections 3A.18 and 24    3B.26 of the Regional Transportation Authority Act.25        (33) Those meetings or portions of meetings of the 26    advisory committee and peer review subcommittee created   SB0243 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    under Section 320 of the Illinois Controlled Substances 2    Act during which specific controlled substance prescriber, 3    dispenser, or patient information is discussed.4        (34) Meetings of the Tax Increment Financing Reform 5    Task Force under Section 2505-800 of the Department of 6    Revenue Law of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 7        (35) Meetings of the group established to discuss 8    Medicaid capitation rates under Section 5-30.8 of the 9    Illinois Public Aid Code. 10        (36) Those deliberations or portions of deliberations 11    for decisions of the Illinois Gaming Board in which there 12    is discussed any of the following: (i) personal, 13    commercial, financial, or other information obtained from 14    any source that is privileged, proprietary, confidential, 15    or a trade secret; or (ii) information specifically 16    exempted from the disclosure by federal or State law.17        (37) Deliberations for decisions of the Illinois Law 18    Enforcement Training Standards Board, the Certification 19    Review Panel, and the Illinois State Police Merit Board 20    regarding certification and decertification. 21        (38) Meetings of the Ad Hoc Statewide Domestic 22    Violence Fatality Review Committee of the Illinois 23    Criminal Justice Information Authority Board that occur in 24    closed executive session under subsection (d) of Section 25    35 of the Domestic Violence Fatality Review Act. 26        (39) Meetings of the regional review teams under   SB0243 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    subsection (a) of Section 75 of the Domestic Violence 2    Fatality Review Act. 3        (40) Meetings of the Firearm Owner's Identification 4    Card Review Board under Section 10 of the Firearm Owners 5    Identification Card Act. 6    (d) Definitions. For purposes of this Section:7    "Employee" means a person employed by a public body whose 8relationship with the public body constitutes an 9employer-employee relationship under the usual common law 10rules, and who is not an independent contractor.11    "Public office" means a position created by or under the 12Constitution or laws of this State, the occupant of which is 13charged with the exercise of some portion of the sovereign 14power of this State. The term "public office" shall include 15members of the public body, but it shall not include 16organizational positions filled by members thereof, whether 17established by law or by a public body itself, that exist to 18assist the body in the conduct of its business.19    "Quasi-adjudicative body" means an administrative body 20charged by law or ordinance with the responsibility to conduct 21hearings, receive evidence or testimony and make 22determinations based thereon, but does not include local 23electoral boards when such bodies are considering petition 24challenges.25    (e) Final action. No final action may be taken at a closed 26meeting. Final action shall be preceded by a public recital of   SB0243 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1the nature of the matter being considered and other 2information that will inform the public of the business being 3conducted. 4(Source: P.A. 102-237, eff. 1-1-22; 102-520, eff. 8-20-21; 5102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-813, eff. 5-13-22; 103-311, eff. 67-28-23; 103-626, eff. 1-1-25.) 7    (5 ILCS 120/2.07 new)8    Sec. 2.07. Meetings on election days; prohibited.9    (a) A public body may not hold or schedule a regular or 10special meeting on the day of a general primary election, a 11general election, a consolidated primary election, or a 12consolidated election, as defined in the Election Code. 13    (b) A home rule unit may not hold or schedule meetings in a 14manner inconsistent with this Act. This Section is a denial 15and limitation of home rule powers and functions in accordance 16with subsection (i) of Section 6 of Article VII of the Illinois 17Constitution.  18    (5 ILCS 120/7)19    Sec. 7. Attendance by a means other than physical 20presence.21    (a) If a quorum of the members of the public body is 22physically present as required by Section 2.01, a majority of 23the public body may allow a member of that body to attend the 24meeting by other means if the member is prevented from   SB0243 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1physically attending because of: (i) personal illness or 2disability; (ii) employment purposes or the business of the 3public body; (iii) a family or other emergency; or (iv) 4unexpected childcare obligations; or (v) performance of active 5military duty as a service member. "Other means" is by video or 6audio conference. As used in this subsection: 7    "Active military duty" has the meaning given to "active 8service" in Section 1-10 of the Service Member Employment and 9Reemployment Rights Act.10    "Service member" means a resident of Illinois who is a 11member of any component of the U.S. Armed Forces or the 12National Guard of any state, the District of Columbia, a 13commonwealth, or a territory of the United States. 14    (b) If a member wishes to attend a meeting by other means, 15the member must notify the recording secretary or clerk of the 16public body before the meeting unless advance notice is 17impractical.18    (c) A majority of the public body may allow a member to 19attend a meeting by other means only in accordance with and to 20the extent allowed by rules adopted by the public body. The 21rules must conform to the requirements and restrictions of 22this Section, may further limit the extent to which attendance 23by other means is allowed, and may provide for the giving of 24additional notice to the public or further facilitate public 25access to meetings. 26    (d) The limitations of this Section shall not apply to (i)   SB0243 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1closed meetings of (A) public bodies with statewide 2jurisdiction, (B) Illinois library systems with jurisdiction 3over a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square 4miles, (C) municipal transit districts with jurisdiction over 5a specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles, or 6(D) local workforce innovation areas with jurisdiction over a 7specific geographic area of more than 4,500 square miles or 8(ii) open or closed meetings of State advisory boards or 9bodies that do not have authority to make binding 10recommendations or determinations or to take any other 11substantive action. State advisory boards or bodies, public 12bodies with statewide jurisdiction, Illinois library systems 13with jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 144,500 square miles, municipal transit districts with 15jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 164,500 square miles, and local workforce investment areas with 17jurisdiction over a specific geographic area of more than 184,500 square miles, however, may permit members to attend 19meetings by other means only in accordance with and to the 20extent allowed by specific procedural rules adopted by the 21body. For the purposes of this Section, "local workforce 22innovation area" means any local workforce innovation area or 23areas designated by the Governor pursuant to the federal 24Workforce Innovation and Opportunity Act or its reauthorizing 25legislation. 26    (e) Subject to the requirements of Section 2.06 but   SB0243 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1notwithstanding any other provision of law, an open or closed 2meeting subject to this Act may be conducted by audio or video 3conference, without the physical presence of a quorum of the 4members, so long as the following conditions are met:5        (1) the Governor or the Director of the Illinois 6    Department of Public Health has issued a disaster 7    declaration related to public health concerns because of a 8    disaster as defined in Section 4 of the Illinois Emergency 9    Management Agency Act, and all or part of the jurisdiction 10    of the public body is covered by the disaster area;11        (2) the head of the public body as defined in 12    subsection (e) of Section 2 of the Freedom of Information 13    Act determines that an in-person meeting or a meeting 14    conducted under this Act is not practical or prudent 15    because of a disaster;16        (3) all members of the body participating in the 17    meeting, wherever their physical location, shall be 18    verified and can hear one another and can hear all 19    discussion and testimony;20        (4) for open meetings, members of the public present 21    at the regular meeting location of the body can hear all 22    discussion and testimony and all votes of the members of 23    the body, unless attendance at the regular meeting 24    location is not feasible due to the disaster, including 25    the issued disaster declaration, in which case the public 26    body must make alternative arrangements and provide notice   SB0243 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    pursuant to this Section of such alternative arrangements 2    in a manner to allow any interested member of the public 3    access to contemporaneously hear all discussion, 4    testimony, and roll call votes, such as by offering a 5    telephone number or a web-based link;6        (5) at least one member of the body, chief legal 7    counsel, or chief administrative officer is physically 8    present at the regular meeting location, unless unfeasible 9    due to the disaster, including the issued disaster 10    declaration; and11        (6) all votes are conducted by roll call, so each 12    member's vote on each issue can be identified and 13    recorded.14        (7) Except in the event of a bona fide emergency, 48 15    hours' notice shall be given of a meeting to be held 16    pursuant to this Section. Notice shall be given to all 17    members of the public body, shall be posted on the website 18    of the public body, and shall also be provided to any news 19    media who has requested notice of meetings pursuant to 20    subsection (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act. If the public 21    body declares a bona fide emergency:22            (A) Notice shall be given pursuant to subsection 23        (a) of Section 2.02 of this Act, and the presiding 24        officer shall state the nature of the emergency at the 25        beginning of the meeting.26            (B) The public body must comply with the verbatim   SB0243 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        recording requirements set forth in Section 2.06 of 2        this Act.3        (8) Each member of the body participating in a meeting 4    by audio or video conference for a meeting held pursuant 5    to this Section is considered present at the meeting for 6    purposes of determining a quorum and participating in all 7    proceedings.8        (9) In addition to the requirements for open meetings 9    under Section 2.06, public bodies holding open meetings 10    under this subsection (e) must also keep a verbatim record 11    of all their meetings in the form of an audio or video 12    recording. Verbatim records made under this paragraph (9) 13    shall be made available to the public under, and are 14    otherwise subject to, the provisions of Section 2.06.15        (10) The public body shall bear all costs associated 16    with compliance with this subsection (e).17(Source: P.A. 103-311, eff. 7-28-23.) 18    Section 10. The Freedom of Information Act is amended by 19changing Sections 2, 3, 4, 7, and 9.5 as follows: 20    (5 ILCS 140/2)  (from Ch. 116, par. 202)21    Sec. 2. Definitions. As used in this Act:22    (a) "Public body" means all legislative, executive, 23administrative, or advisory bodies of the State, state 24universities and colleges, counties, townships, cities,   SB0243 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1villages, incorporated towns, school districts and all other 2municipal corporations, boards, bureaus, committees, or 3commissions of this State, any subsidiary bodies of any of the 4foregoing including but not limited to committees and 5subcommittees thereof, and a School Finance Authority created 6under Article 1E of the School Code. "Public body" does not 7include a child death review team or the Illinois Child Death 8Review Teams Executive Council established under the Child 9Death Review Team Act, or a regional youth advisory board or 10the Statewide Youth Advisory Board established under the 11Department of Children and Family Services Statewide Youth 12Advisory Board Act.13    (b) "Person" means any individual or any individual acting 14as an agent of a , corporation, partnership, firm, 15organization or association, acting individually or as a 16group.17    (c) "Public records" means all records, reports, forms, 18writings, letters, memoranda, books, papers, maps, 19photographs, microfilms, cards, tapes, recordings, electronic 20data processing records, electronic communications, recorded 21information and all other documentary materials pertaining to 22the transaction of public business, regardless of physical 23form or characteristics, having been prepared by or for, or 24having been or being used by, received by, in the possession 25of, or under the control of any public body. "Public records" 26does not include junk mail.   SB0243 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    (c-5) "Private information" means unique identifiers, 2including a person's social security number, driver's license 3number, employee identification number, biometric identifiers, 4personal financial information, passwords or other access 5codes, medical records, home or personal telephone numbers, 6and personal email addresses. Private information also 7includes home address and personal license plates, except as 8otherwise provided by law or when compiled without possibility 9of attribution to any person. For a public body that is a 10HIPAA-covered entity, "private information" includes 11electronic medical records and all information, including 12demographic information, contained within or extracted from an 13electronic medical records system operated or maintained by 14the public body in compliance with State and federal medical 15privacy laws and regulations, including, but not limited to, 16the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act and 17its regulations, 45 CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this 18subsection, "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to 19the term "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103.20    (c-10) "Commercial purpose" means the use of any part of a 21public record or records, or information derived from public 22records, in any form for sale, resale, or solicitation or 23advertisement for sales or services. For purposes of this 24definition, requests made by news media and non-profit, 25scientific, or academic organizations shall not be considered 26to be made for a "commercial purpose" when the principal   SB0243 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1purpose of the request is (i) to access and disseminate 2information concerning news and current or passing events, 3(ii) for articles of opinion or features of interest to the 4public, or (iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or 5public research or education.6    (d) "Copying" means the reproduction of any public record 7by means of any photographic, electronic, mechanical or other 8process, device or means now known or hereafter developed and 9available to the public body.10    (e) "Head of the public body" means the president, mayor, 11chairman, presiding officer, director, superintendent, 12manager, supervisor or individual otherwise holding primary 13executive and administrative authority for the public body, or 14such person's duly authorized designee.15    (f) "News media" means a newspaper or other periodical 16issued at regular intervals whether in print or electronic 17format, a news service whether in print or electronic format, 18a radio station, a television station, a television network, a 19community antenna television service, or a person or 20corporation engaged in making news reels or other motion 21picture news for public showing.22    (g) "Recurrent requester", as used in Section 3.2 of this 23Act, means a person that, in the 12 months immediately 24preceding the request, has submitted to the same public body 25(i) a minimum of 50 requests for records, (ii) a minimum of 15 26requests for records within a 30-day period, or (iii) a   SB0243 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1minimum of 7 requests for records within a 7-day period. For 2purposes of this definition, requests made by news media and 3non-profit, scientific, or academic organizations shall not be 4considered in calculating the number of requests made in the 5time periods in this definition when the principal purpose of 6the requests is (i) to access and disseminate information 7concerning news and current or passing events, (ii) for 8articles of opinion or features of interest to the public, or 9(iii) for the purpose of academic, scientific, or public 10research or education.11    For the purposes of this subsection (g), "request" means a 12written document (or oral request, if the public body chooses 13to honor oral requests) that is submitted to a public body via 14personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 15means available to the public body and that identifies the 16particular public record the requester seeks. One request may 17identify multiple records to be inspected or copied. 18    (h) "Voluminous request" means a request that: (i) 19includes more than 5 individual requests for more than 5 20different categories of records or a combination of individual 21requests that total requests for more than 5 different 22categories of records in a period of 20 business days; or (ii) 23requires the compilation of more than 500 letter or 24legal-sized pages of public records unless a single requested 25record exceeds 500 pages. "Single requested record" may 26include, but is not limited to, one report, form, e-mail,   SB0243 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1letter, memorandum, book, map, microfilm, tape, or recording.2    "Voluminous request" does not include a request made by 3news media and non-profit, scientific, or academic 4organizations if the principal purpose of the request is: (1) 5to access and disseminate information concerning news and 6current or passing events; (2) for articles of opinion or 7features of interest to the public; or (3) for the purpose of 8academic, scientific, or public research or education.9    For the purposes of this subsection (h), "request" means a 10written document, or oral request, if the public body chooses 11to honor oral requests, that is submitted to a public body via 12personal delivery, mail, telefax, electronic mail, or other 13means available to the public body and that identifies the 14particular public record or records the requester seeks. One 15request may identify multiple individual records to be 16inspected or copied. 17    (i) "Severance agreement" means a mutual agreement between 18any public body and its employee for the employee's 19resignation in exchange for payment by the public body. 20    (j) "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail 21sent to a public body and not responded to by an official, 22employee, or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited 23commercial electronic communication sent to a public body and 24not responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the 25public body. 26(Source: P.A. 103-554, eff. 1-1-24.)   SB0243 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    (5 ILCS 140/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 203)2    Sec. 3. (a) Each public body shall make available to any 3person for inspection or copying all public records, except as 4otherwise provided in Sections 7 and 8.5 of this Act. 5Notwithstanding any other law, a public body may not grant to 6any person or entity, whether by contract, license, or 7otherwise, the exclusive right to access and disseminate any 8public record as defined in this Act.9    (b) Subject to the fee provisions of Section 6 of this Act, 10each public body shall promptly provide, to any person who 11submits a request, a copy of any public record required to be 12disclosed by subsection (a) of this Section and shall certify 13such copy if so requested.14    (c) Requests for inspection or copies shall be made in 15writing and directed to the public body. Written requests may 16be submitted to a public body via personal delivery, mail, 17telefax, or other means available to the public body. 18Electronic requests under this Section must appear in their 19entirety within the body of the electronic submission. As a 20cybersecurity measure, no public body shall be required to 21open electronically attached files or hyperlinks to view or 22access details of a request. A public body that receives a 23request that would require the public body to open hyperlinks 24or attached files shall, within 5 business days, notify the 25requester of the requirement that the entirety of an   SB0243 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1electronic request must appear within the body of the 2electronic submission. A public body may honor oral requests 3for inspection or copying. A public body may not require that a 4request be submitted on a standard form or require the 5requester to specify the purpose for a request, except to 6determine whether the records are requested for a commercial 7purpose or whether to grant a request for a fee waiver. All 8requests for inspection and copying received by a public body 9shall immediately be forwarded to its Freedom of Information 10officer or designee. 11    (d) Each public body shall, promptly, either comply with 12or deny a request for public records within 5 business days 13after its receipt of the request, unless the time for response 14is properly extended under subsection (e) of this Section. 15Denial shall be in writing as provided in Section 9 of this 16Act. Failure to comply with a written request, extend the time 17for response, or deny a request within 5 business days after 18its receipt shall be considered a denial of the request. A 19public body that fails to respond to a request within the 20requisite periods in this Section but thereafter provides the 21requester with copies of the requested public records may not 22impose a fee for such copies. A public body that fails to 23respond to a request received may not treat the request as 24unduly burdensome under subsection (g). 25    (e) The time for response under this Section may be 26extended by the public body for not more than 5 business days   SB0243 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1from the original due date for any of the following reasons:2        (i) the requested records are stored in whole or in 3    part at other locations than the office having charge of 4    the requested records;5        (ii) the request requires the collection of a 6    substantial number of specified records;7        (iii) the request is couched in categorical terms and 8    requires an extensive search for the records responsive to 9    it;10        (iv) the requested records have not been located in 11    the course of routine search and additional efforts are 12    being made to locate them;13        (v) the requested records require examination and 14    evaluation by personnel having the necessary competence 15    and discretion to determine if they are exempt from 16    disclosure under Section 7 of this Act or should be 17    revealed only with appropriate deletions;18        (vi) the request for records cannot be complied with 19    by the public body within the time limits prescribed by 20    subsection (d) of this Section without unduly burdening or 21    interfering with the operations of the public body;22        (vii) there is a need for consultation, which shall be 23    conducted with all practicable speed, with another public 24    body or among 2 or more components of a public body having 25    a substantial interest in the determination or in the 26    subject matter of the request.  SB0243 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    The person making a request and the public body may agree 2in writing to extend the time for compliance for a period to be 3determined by the parties. If the requester and the public 4body agree to extend the period for compliance, a failure by 5the public body to comply with any previous deadlines shall 6not be treated as a denial of the request for the records. 7    (f) When additional time is required for any of the above 8reasons, the public body shall, within 5 business days after 9receipt of the request, notify the person making the request 10of the reasons for the extension and the date by which the 11response will be forthcoming. Failure to respond within the 12time permitted for extension shall be considered a denial of 13the request. A public body that fails to respond to a request 14within the time permitted for extension but thereafter 15provides the requester with copies of the requested public 16records may not impose a fee for those copies. A public body 17that requests an extension and subsequently fails to respond 18to the request may not treat the request as unduly burdensome 19under subsection (g).20    (g) Requests calling for all records falling within a 21category shall be complied with unless compliance with the 22request would be unduly burdensome for the complying public 23body and there is no way to narrow the request and the burden 24on the public body outweighs the public interest in the 25information. Before invoking this exemption, the public body 26shall extend to the person making the request an opportunity   SB0243 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1to confer with it in an attempt to reduce the request to 2manageable proportions. If any public body responds to a 3categorical request by stating that compliance would unduly 4burden its operation and the conditions described above are 5met, it shall do so in writing, specifying the reasons why it 6would be unduly burdensome and the extent to which compliance 7will so burden the operations of the public body. Such a 8response shall be treated as a denial of the request for 9information. 10    Repeated requests from the same person for the same 11records that are unchanged or identical to records previously 12provided or properly denied under this Act shall be deemed 13unduly burdensome under this provision.14    (h) Each public body may promulgate rules and regulations 15in conformity with the provisions of this Section pertaining 16to the availability of records and procedures to be followed, 17including:18        (i) the times and places where such records will be 19    made available, and20        (ii) the persons from whom such records may be 21    obtained.22    (i) The time periods for compliance or denial of a request 23to inspect or copy records set out in this Section shall not 24apply to requests for records made for a commercial purpose, 25requests by a recurrent requester, or voluminous requests. 26Such requests shall be subject to the provisions of Sections   SB0243 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b13.1, 3.2, and 3.6 of this Act, as applicable. 2    (j) Within 5 business days after its receipt of the 3request, a public body that has a reasonable belief that a 4request was not submitted by a person may require the 5requester to verify orally or in writing that the requester is 6a person. The deadline for the public body to respond to the 7request shall be tolled until the requester verifies that he 8or she is a person. If the requester fails to verify that he or 9she is a person within 30 days after the public body requests 10such a verification, then the public body may deny the 11request. For purposes of this subsection (j), a public body 12may not require the requester to submit personal information, 13private information, or identifying information to verify that 14the requester is a person.15(Source: P.A. 101-81, eff. 7-12-19.) 16    (5 ILCS 140/4)  (from Ch. 116, par. 204)17    Sec. 4. Each public body shall prominently display on its 18website at each of its administrative or regional offices, 19make available for inspection and copying, and send through 20the mail if requested, each of the following:21        (a) A brief description of itself, which will include, 22    but not be limited to, a short summary of its purpose, a 23    block diagram giving its functional subdivisions, the 24    total amount of its operating budget, the number and 25    location of all of its separate offices, the approximate   SB0243 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    number of full and part-time employees, and the 2    identification and membership of any board, commission, 3    committee, or council which operates in an advisory 4    capacity relative to the operation of the public body, or 5    which exercises control over its policies or procedures, 6    or to which the public body is required to report and be 7    answerable for its operations; and8        (b) A brief description of the methods whereby the 9    public may request information and public records, a 10    directory designating the Freedom of Information officer 11    or officers, the address where requests for public records 12    should be directed, and any fees allowable under Section 6 13    of this Act.14    If a A public body does not maintain that maintains a 15website, it shall also post this information at each of its 16administrative or regional offices on its website. 17(Source: P.A. 96-542, eff. 1-1-10; 96-1000, eff. 7-2-10.) 18    (5 ILCS 140/7)19    Sec. 7. Exemptions. 20    (1) When a request is made to inspect or copy a public 21record that contains information that is exempt from 22disclosure under this Section, but also contains information 23that is not exempt from disclosure, the public body may elect 24to redact the information that is exempt. The public body 25shall make the remaining information available for inspection   SB0243 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1and copying. Subject to this requirement, the following shall 2be exempt from inspection and copying: 3        (a) Information specifically prohibited from 4    disclosure by federal or State law or rules and 5    regulations implementing federal or State law. 6        (b) Private information, unless disclosure is required 7    by another provision of this Act, a State or federal law, 8    or a court order. 9        (b-5) Files, documents, and other data or databases 10    maintained by one or more law enforcement agencies and 11    specifically designed to provide information to one or 12    more law enforcement agencies regarding the physical or 13    mental status of one or more individual subjects. 14        (c) Personal information contained within public 15    records, the disclosure of which would constitute a 16    clearly unwarranted invasion of personal privacy, unless 17    the disclosure is consented to in writing by the 18    individual subjects of the information. "Unwarranted 19    invasion of personal privacy" means the disclosure of 20    information that is highly personal or objectionable to a 21    reasonable person and in which the subject's right to 22    privacy outweighs any legitimate public interest in 23    obtaining the information. The disclosure of information 24    that bears on the public duties of public employees and 25    officials shall not be considered an invasion of personal 26    privacy.   SB0243 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        (d) Records in the possession of any public body 2    created in the course of administrative enforcement 3    proceedings, and any law enforcement or correctional 4    agency for law enforcement purposes, but only to the 5    extent that disclosure would: 6            (i) interfere with pending or actually and 7        reasonably contemplated law enforcement proceedings 8        conducted by any law enforcement or correctional 9        agency that is the recipient of the request; 10            (ii) interfere with active administrative 11        enforcement proceedings conducted by the public body 12        that is the recipient of the request; 13            (iii) create a substantial likelihood that a 14        person will be deprived of a fair trial or an impartial 15        hearing; 16            (iv) unavoidably disclose the identity of a 17        confidential source, confidential information 18        furnished only by the confidential source, or persons 19        who file complaints with or provide information to 20        administrative, investigative, law enforcement, or 21        penal agencies; except that the identities of 22        witnesses to traffic crashes, traffic crash reports, 23        and rescue reports shall be provided by agencies of 24        local government, except when disclosure would 25        interfere with an active criminal investigation 26        conducted by the agency that is the recipient of the   SB0243 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        request; 2            (v) disclose unique or specialized investigative 3        techniques other than those generally used and known 4        or disclose internal documents of correctional 5        agencies related to detection, observation, or 6        investigation of incidents of crime or misconduct, and 7        disclosure would result in demonstrable harm to the 8        agency or public body that is the recipient of the 9        request; 10            (vi) endanger the life or physical safety of law 11        enforcement personnel or any other person; or 12            (vii) obstruct an ongoing criminal investigation 13        by the agency that is the recipient of the request. 14        (d-5) A law enforcement record created for law 15    enforcement purposes and contained in a shared electronic 16    record management system if the law enforcement agency or 17    criminal justice agency that is the recipient of the 18    request did not create the record, did not participate in 19    or have a role in any of the events which are the subject 20    of the record, and only has access to the record through 21    the shared electronic record management system. As used in 22    this subsection (d-5), "criminal justice agency" means the 23    Illinois Criminal Justice Information Authority or the 24    Illinois Sentencing Policy Advisory Council. 25        (d-6) Records contained in the Officer Professional 26    Conduct Database under Section 9.2 of the Illinois Police   SB0243 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Training Act, except to the extent authorized under that 2    Section. This includes the documents supplied to the 3    Illinois Law Enforcement Training Standards Board from the 4    Illinois State Police and Illinois State Police Merit 5    Board. 6        (d-7) Information gathered or records created from the 7    use of automatic license plate readers in connection with 8    Section 2-130 of the Illinois Vehicle Code. 9        (e) Records that relate to or affect the security of 10    correctional institutions and detention facilities. 11        (e-5) Records requested by persons committed to the 12    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 13    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 14    materials are available in the library of the correctional 15    institution or facility or jail where the inmate is 16    confined. 17        (e-6) Records requested by persons committed to the 18    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 19    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail if those 20    materials include records from staff members' personnel 21    files, staff rosters, or other staffing assignment 22    information. 23        (e-7) Records requested by persons committed to the 24    Department of Corrections or Department of Human Services 25    Division of Mental Health if those materials are available 26    through an administrative request to the Department of   SB0243 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Corrections or Department of Human Services Division of 2    Mental Health. 3        (e-8) Records requested by a person committed to the 4    Department of Corrections, Department of Human Services 5    Division of Mental Health, or a county jail, the 6    disclosure of which would result in the risk of harm to any 7    person or the risk of an escape from a jail or correctional 8    institution or facility.9        (e-9) Records requested by a person in a county jail 10    or committed to the Department of Corrections or 11    Department of Human Services Division of Mental Health, 12    containing personal information pertaining to the person's 13    victim or the victim's family, including, but not limited 14    to, a victim's home address, home telephone number, work 15    or school address, work telephone number, social security 16    number, or any other identifying information, except as 17    may be relevant to a requester's current or potential case 18    or claim. 19        (e-10) Law enforcement records of other persons 20    requested by a person committed to the Department of 21    Corrections, Department of Human Services Division of 22    Mental Health, or a county jail, including, but not 23    limited to, arrest and booking records, mug shots, and 24    crime scene photographs, except as these records may be 25    relevant to the requester's current or potential case or 26    claim.   SB0243 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1        (f) Preliminary drafts, notes, recommendations, 2    memoranda, and other records in which opinions are 3    expressed, or policies or actions are formulated, except 4    that a specific record or relevant portion of a record 5    shall not be exempt when the record is publicly cited and 6    identified by the head of the public body. The exemption 7    provided in this paragraph (f) extends to all those 8    records of officers and agencies of the General Assembly 9    that pertain to the preparation of legislative documents. 10        (g) Trade secrets and commercial or financial 11    information obtained from a person or business where the 12    trade secrets or commercial or financial information are 13    furnished under a claim that they are proprietary, 14    privileged, or confidential, and that disclosure of the 15    trade secrets or commercial or financial information would 16    cause competitive harm to the person or business, and only 17    insofar as the claim directly applies to the records 18    requested.19        The information included under this exemption includes 20    all trade secrets and commercial or financial information 21    obtained by a public body, including a public pension 22    fund, from a private equity fund or a privately held 23    company within the investment portfolio of a private 24    equity fund as a result of either investing or evaluating 25    a potential investment of public funds in a private equity 26    fund. The exemption contained in this item does not apply   SB0243 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    to the aggregate financial performance information of a 2    private equity fund, nor to the identity of the fund's 3    managers or general partners. The exemption contained in 4    this item does not apply to the identity of a privately 5    held company within the investment portfolio of a private 6    equity fund, unless the disclosure of the identity of a 7    privately held company may cause competitive harm.8        Nothing contained in this paragraph (g) shall be 9    construed to prevent a person or business from consenting 10    to disclosure. 11        (h) Proposals and bids for any contract, grant, or 12    agreement, including information which if it were 13    disclosed would frustrate procurement or give an advantage 14    to any person proposing to enter into a contractor 15    agreement with the body, until an award or final selection 16    is made. Information prepared by or for the body in 17    preparation of a bid solicitation shall be exempt until an 18    award or final selection is made. 19        (i) Valuable formulae, computer geographic systems, 20    designs, drawings, and research data obtained or produced 21    by any public body when disclosure could reasonably be 22    expected to produce private gain or public loss. The 23    exemption for "computer geographic systems" provided in 24    this paragraph (i) does not extend to requests made by 25    news media as defined in Section 2 of this Act when the 26    requested information is not otherwise exempt and the only   SB0243 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    purpose of the request is to access and disseminate 2    information regarding the health, safety, welfare, or 3    legal rights of the general public. 4        (j) The following information pertaining to 5    educational matters:6            (i) test questions, scoring keys, and other 7        examination data used to administer an academic 8        examination; 9            (ii) information received by a primary or 10        secondary school, college, or university under its 11        procedures for the evaluation of faculty members by 12        their academic peers; 13            (iii) information concerning a school or 14        university's adjudication of student disciplinary 15        cases, but only to the extent that disclosure would 16        unavoidably reveal the identity of the student; and17            (iv) course materials or research materials used 18        by faculty members. 19        (k) Architects' plans, engineers' technical 20    submissions, and other construction related technical 21    documents for projects not constructed or developed in 22    whole or in part with public funds and the same for 23    projects constructed or developed with public funds, 24    including, but not limited to, power generating and 25    distribution stations and other transmission and 26    distribution facilities, water treatment facilities,   SB0243 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    airport facilities, sport stadiums, convention centers, 2    and all government owned, operated, or occupied buildings, 3    but only to the extent that disclosure would compromise 4    security. 5        (l) Minutes of meetings of public bodies closed to the 6    public as provided in the Open Meetings Act until the 7    public body makes the minutes available to the public 8    under Section 2.06 of the Open Meetings Act. 9        (m) Communications between a public body and an 10    attorney or auditor representing the public body that 11    would not be subject to discovery in litigation, and 12    materials prepared or compiled by or for a public body in 13    anticipation of a criminal, civil, or administrative 14    proceeding upon the request of an attorney advising the 15    public body, and materials prepared or compiled with 16    respect to internal audits of public bodies. 17        (n) Records relating to a public body's adjudication 18    of employee grievances or disciplinary cases; however, 19    this exemption shall not extend to the final outcome of 20    cases in which discipline is imposed. 21        (o) Administrative or technical information associated 22    with automated data processing operations, including, but 23    not limited to, software, operating protocols, computer 24    program abstracts, file layouts, source listings, object 25    modules, load modules, user guides, documentation 26    pertaining to all logical and physical design of   SB0243 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    computerized systems, employee manuals, and any other 2    information that, if disclosed, would jeopardize the 3    security of the system or its data or the security of 4    materials exempt under this Section. 5        (p) Records relating to collective negotiating matters 6    between public bodies and their employees or 7    representatives, except that any final contract or 8    agreement shall be subject to inspection and copying. 9        (q) Test questions, scoring keys, and other 10    examination data used to determine the qualifications of 11    an applicant for a license or employment. 12        (r) The records, documents, and information relating 13    to real estate purchase negotiations until those 14    negotiations have been completed or otherwise terminated. 15    With regard to a parcel involved in a pending or actually 16    and reasonably contemplated eminent domain proceeding 17    under the Eminent Domain Act, records, documents, and 18    information relating to that parcel shall be exempt except 19    as may be allowed under discovery rules adopted by the 20    Illinois Supreme Court. The records, documents, and 21    information relating to a real estate sale shall be exempt 22    until a sale is consummated. 23        (s) Any and all proprietary information and records 24    related to the operation of an intergovernmental risk 25    management association or self-insurance pool or jointly 26    self-administered health and accident cooperative or pool.   SB0243 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Insurance or self-insurance (including any 2    intergovernmental risk management association or 3    self-insurance pool) claims, loss or risk management 4    information, records, data, advice, or communications. 5        (t) Information contained in or related to 6    examination, operating, or condition reports prepared by, 7    on behalf of, or for the use of a public body responsible 8    for the regulation or supervision of financial 9    institutions, insurance companies, or pharmacy benefit 10    managers, unless disclosure is otherwise required by State 11    law. 12        (u) Information that would disclose or might lead to 13    the disclosure of secret or confidential information, 14    codes, algorithms, programs, or private keys intended to 15    be used to create electronic signatures under the Uniform 16    Electronic Transactions Act. 17        (v) Vulnerability assessments, security measures, and 18    response policies or plans that are designed to identify, 19    prevent, or respond to potential attacks upon a 20    community's population or systems, facilities, or 21    installations, but only to the extent that disclosure 22    could reasonably be expected to expose the vulnerability 23    or jeopardize the effectiveness of the measures, policies, 24    or plans, or the safety of the personnel who implement 25    them or the public. Information exempt under this item may 26    include such things as details pertaining to the   SB0243 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    mobilization or deployment of personnel or equipment, to 2    the operation of communication systems or protocols, to 3    cybersecurity vulnerabilities, or to tactical operations. 4        (w) (Blank). 5        (x) Maps and other records regarding the location or 6    security of generation, transmission, distribution, 7    storage, gathering, treatment, or switching facilities 8    owned by a utility, by a power generator, or by the 9    Illinois Power Agency. 10        (y) Information contained in or related to proposals, 11    bids, or negotiations related to electric power 12    procurement under Section 1-75 of the Illinois Power 13    Agency Act and Section 16-111.5 of the Public Utilities 14    Act that is determined to be confidential and proprietary 15    by the Illinois Power Agency or by the Illinois Commerce 16    Commission. 17        (z) Information about students exempted from 18    disclosure under Section 10-20.38 or 34-18.29 of the 19    School Code, and information about undergraduate students 20    enrolled at an institution of higher education exempted 21    from disclosure under Section 25 of the Illinois Credit 22    Card Marketing Act of 2009. 23        (aa) Information the disclosure of which is exempted 24    under the Viatical Settlements Act of 2009. 25        (bb) Records and information provided to a mortality 26    review team and records maintained by a mortality review   SB0243 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    team appointed under the Department of Juvenile Justice 2    Mortality Review Team Act. 3        (cc) Information regarding interments, entombments, or 4    inurnments of human remains that are submitted to the 5    Cemetery Oversight Database under the Cemetery Care Act or 6    the Cemetery Oversight Act, whichever is applicable.7        (dd) Correspondence and records (i) that may not be 8    disclosed under Section 11-9 of the Illinois Public Aid 9    Code or (ii) that pertain to appeals under Section 11-8 of 10    the Illinois Public Aid Code. 11        (ee) The names, addresses, or other personal 12    information of persons who are minors and are also 13    participants and registrants in programs of park 14    districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 15    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 16    associations.17        (ff) The names, addresses, or other personal 18    information of participants and registrants in programs of 19    park districts, forest preserve districts, conservation 20    districts, recreation agencies, and special recreation 21    associations where such programs are targeted primarily to 22    minors.23        (gg) Confidential information described in Section 24    1-100 of the Illinois Independent Tax Tribunal Act of 25    2012. 26        (hh) The report submitted to the State Board of   SB0243 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Education by the School Security and Standards Task Force 2    under item (8) of subsection (d) of Section 2-3.160 of the 3    School Code and any information contained in that report. 4        (ii) Records requested by persons committed to or 5    detained by the Department of Human Services under the 6    Sexually Violent Persons Commitment Act or committed to 7    the Department of Corrections under the Sexually Dangerous 8    Persons Act if those materials: (i) are available in the 9    library of the facility where the individual is confined; 10    (ii) include records from staff members' personnel files, 11    staff rosters, or other staffing assignment information; 12    or (iii) are available through an administrative request 13    to the Department of Human Services or the Department of 14    Corrections.15        (jj) Confidential information described in Section 16    5-535 of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois. 17        (kk) The public body's credit card numbers, debit card 18    numbers, bank account numbers, Federal Employer 19    Identification Number, security code numbers, passwords, 20    and similar account information, the disclosure of which 21    could result in identity theft or impression or defrauding 22    of a governmental entity or a person. 23        (ll) Records concerning the work of the threat 24    assessment team of a school district, including, but not 25    limited to, any threat assessment procedure under the 26    School Safety Drill Act and any information contained in   SB0243 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    the procedure.2        (mm) Information prohibited from being disclosed under 3    subsections (a) and (b) of Section 15 of the Student 4    Confidential Reporting Act. 5        (nn) Proprietary information submitted to the 6    Environmental Protection Agency under the Drug Take-Back 7    Act. 8        (oo) Records described in subsection (f) of Section 9    3-5-1 of the Unified Code of Corrections. 10        (pp) Any and all information regarding burials, 11    interments, or entombments of human remains as required to 12    be reported to the Department of Natural Resources 13    pursuant either to the Archaeological and Paleontological 14    Resources Protection Act or the Human Remains Protection 15    Act.16        (qq) Reports described in subsection (e) of Section 17    16-15 of the Abortion Care Clinical Training Program Act. 18        (rr) Information obtained by a certified local health 19    department under the Access to Public Health Data Act. 20        (ss) For a request directed to a public body that is 21    also a HIPAA-covered entity, all information that is 22    protected health information, including demographic 23    information, that may be contained within or extracted 24    from any record held by the public body in compliance with 25    State and federal medical privacy laws and regulations, 26    including, but not limited to, the Health Insurance   SB0243 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    Portability and Accountability Act and its regulations, 45 2    CFR Parts 160 and 164. As used in this paragraph, 3    "HIPAA-covered entity" has the meaning given to the term 4    "covered entity" in 45 CFR 160.103 and "protected health 5    information" has the meaning given to that term in 45 CFR 6    160.103. 7        (tt) Proposals or bids submitted by engineering 8    consultants in response to requests for proposal or other 9    competitive bidding requests by the Department of 10    Transportation or the Illinois Toll Highway Authority. 11        (uu) Documents that, pursuant to the State of 12    Illinois' 1987 Agreement with the U.S. Nuclear Regulatory 13    Commission and the corresponding requirement to maintain 14    compatibility with the National Materials Program, have 15    been determined to be security sensitive. These documents 16    include information classified as safeguards, 17    safeguards-modified, and sensitive unclassified 18    nonsafeguards information, as identified in U.S. Nuclear 19    Regulatory Commission regulatory information summaries, 20    security advisories, and other applicable communications 21    or regulations related to the control and distribution of 22    security sensitive information. 23    (1.5) Any information exempt from disclosure under the 24Judicial Privacy Act shall be redacted from public records 25prior to disclosure under this Act. 26    (2) A public record that is not in the possession of a   SB0243 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1public body but is in the possession of a party with whom the 2agency has contracted to perform a governmental function on 3behalf of the public body, and that directly relates to the 4governmental function and is not otherwise exempt under this 5Act, shall be considered a public record of the public body, 6for purposes of this Act. 7    (3) This Section does not authorize withholding of 8information or limit the availability of records to the 9public, except as stated in this Section or otherwise provided 10in this Act. 11(Source: P.A. 102-38, eff. 6-25-21; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 12102-694, eff. 1-7-22; 102-752, eff. 5-6-22; 102-753, eff. 131-1-23; 102-776, eff. 1-1-23; 102-791, eff. 5-13-22; 102-982, 14eff. 7-1-23; 102-1055, eff. 6-10-22; 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 15103-423, eff. 1-1-24; 103-446, eff. 8-4-23; 103-462, eff. 168-4-23; 103-540, eff. 1-1-24; 103-554, eff. 1-1-24; 103-605, 17eff. 7-1-24; 103-865, eff. 1-1-25.) 18    (5 ILCS 140/9.5)19    Sec. 9.5. Public Access Counselor; opinions.20    (a) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 21record is denied by a public body, except the General Assembly 22and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof, may file a 23request for review with the Public Access Counselor 24established in the Office of the Attorney General not later 25than 60 days after the date of the final denial. The request   SB0243 Enrolled- 53 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1for review must be in writing, signed by the requester, and 2include (i) a copy of the request for access to records and 3(ii) any responses from the public body.4    (b) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 5record is made for a commercial purpose as defined in 6subsection (c-10) of Section 2 of this Act may not file a 7request for review with the Public Access Counselor. A person 8whose request to inspect or copy a public record was treated by 9the public body as a request for a commercial purpose under 10Section 3.1 of this Act may file a request for review with the 11Public Access Counselor for the limited purpose of reviewing 12whether the public body properly determined that the request 13was made for a commercial purpose. 14    (b-5) A person whose request to inspect or copy a public 15record was treated by a public body, except the General 16Assembly and committees, commissions, and agencies thereof, as 17a voluminous request under Section 3.6 of this Act may file a 18request for review with the Public Access Counselor for the 19purpose of reviewing whether the public body properly 20determined that the request was a voluminous request. 21    (c) Upon receipt of a request for review, the Public 22Access Counselor shall determine whether further action is 23warranted. If the Public Access Counselor determines that the 24alleged violation is unfounded, he or she shall so advise the 25requester and the public body and no further action shall be 26undertaken. In all other cases, the Public Access Counselor   SB0243 Enrolled- 54 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1shall forward a copy of the request for review to the public 2body within 7 business days after receipt and shall specify 3the records or other documents that the public body shall 4furnish to facilitate the review. Within 7 business days after 5receipt of the request for review, the public body shall 6provide copies of records requested and shall otherwise fully 7cooperate with the Public Access Counselor. If a public body 8fails to furnish specified records pursuant to this Section, 9or if otherwise necessary, the Attorney General may issue a 10subpoena to any person or public body having knowledge of or 11records pertaining to a request for review of a denial of 12access to records under the Act. Records or documents obtained 13by the Public Access Counselor from a public body for the 14purpose of addressing a request for review under this Section 15may not be disclosed to the public, including the requester, 16by the Public Access Counselor. These records, while in the 17possession of the Public Access Counselor, are exempt under 18this Act from disclosure by the Public Access Counselor.19    (d) Within 7 business days after it receives a copy of a 20request for review and request for production of records from 21the Public Access Counselor, the public body may, but is not 22required to, answer the allegations of the request for review. 23The answer may take the form of a letter, brief, or memorandum. 24The Public Access Counselor shall forward a copy of the answer 25to the person submitting the request for review, with any 26alleged confidential information to which the request pertains   SB0243 Enrolled- 55 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1redacted from the copy. The requester may, but is not required 2to, respond in writing to the answer within 7 business days and 3shall provide a copy of the response to the public body.4    (e) In addition to the request for review, and the answer 5and the response thereto, if any, a requester or a public body 6may furnish affidavits or records concerning any matter 7germane to the review.8    (f) Unless the Public Access Counselor extends the time by 9no more than 30 business days by sending written notice to the 10requester and the public body that includes a statement of the 11reasons for the extension in the notice, or decides to address 12the matter without the issuance of a binding opinion, the 13Attorney General shall examine the issues and the records, 14shall make findings of fact and conclusions of law, and shall 15issue to the requester and the public body an opinion in 16response to the request for review within 60 days after its 17receipt. The opinion shall be binding upon both the requester 18and the public body, subject to administrative review under 19Section 11.5.20    In responding to any request under this Section 9.5, the 21Attorney General may exercise his or her discretion and choose 22to resolve a request for review by mediation or by a means 23other than the issuance of a binding opinion. The decision not 24to issue a binding opinion shall not be reviewable.25    Upon receipt of a binding opinion concluding that a 26violation of this Act has occurred, the public body shall   SB0243 Enrolled- 56 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1either take necessary action immediately to comply with the 2directive of the opinion or shall initiate administrative 3review under Section 11.5. If the opinion concludes that no 4violation of the Act has occurred, the requester may initiate 5administrative review under Section 11.5.6    A public body and any officer or employee of a public body 7that discloses records in accordance with an opinion of the 8Attorney General is immune from all liabilities by reason 9thereof and shall not be liable for penalties under this Act. 10    (g) If the requester files suit under Section 11 with 11respect to the same denial that is the subject of a pending 12request for review, the requester shall notify the Public 13Access Counselor, and the Public Access Counselor shall take 14no further action with respect to the request for review and 15shall so notify the public body.16    (h) The Attorney General may also issue advisory opinions 17to public bodies regarding compliance with this Act. A review 18may be initiated upon receipt of a written request from the 19head of the public body or its attorney, which shall contain 20sufficient accurate facts from which a determination can be 21made. The Public Access Counselor may request additional 22information from the public body in order to assist in the 23review. A public body that relies in good faith on an advisory 24opinion of the Attorney General in responding to a request is 25not liable for penalties under this Act, so long as the facts 26upon which the opinion is based have been fully and fairly   SB0243 Enrolled- 57 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1disclosed to the Public Access Counselor. 2(Source: P.A. 103-69, eff. 1-1-24.) 3    Section 15. The Local Records Act is amended by changing 4Section 3 as follows: 5    (50 ILCS 205/3)  (from Ch. 116, par. 43.103)6    Sec. 3. Except where the context indicates otherwise, the 7terms used in this Act are defined as follows:8    "Agency" means any court, and all parts, boards, 9departments, bureaus and commissions of any county, municipal 10corporation or political subdivision.11    "Archivist" means the Secretary of State.12    "Born-digital electronic material" means electronic 13material created in digital form rather than converted from 14print or analog form to digital form.15    "Commission" means a Local Records Commission.16    "Court" means a court, other than the Supreme Court.17    "Digitized electronic material" means electronic material 18converted from print or analog form to digital form. 19    "Junk mail" means (i) any unsolicited commercial mail sent 20to a public body and not responded to by an official, employee, 21or agent of the public body or (ii) any unsolicited commercial 22electronic communication sent to a public body and not 23responded to by an official, employee, or agent of the public 24body.   SB0243 Enrolled- 58 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b1    "Officer" means any elected or appointed official of a 2court, county, municipal corporation or political subdivision.3    "Public record" means any book, paper, map, photograph, 4born-digital electronic material, digitized electronic 5material, electronic material with a combination of digitized 6and born-digital material, or other official documentary 7material, regardless of physical form or characteristics, 8made, produced, executed or received by any agency or officer 9pursuant to law or in connection with the transaction of 10public business and preserved or appropriate for preservation 11by such agency or officer, or any successor thereof, as 12evidence of the organization, function, policies, decisions, 13procedures, or other activities thereof, or because of the 14informational data contained therein. Library and museum 15material made or acquired and preserved solely for reference 16or exhibition purposes, extra copies of documents preserved 17only for convenience of reference, and stocks of publications 18and of processed documents, and junk mail are not included 19within the definition of public record. Paper copies of 20registration records, as defined in Section 1 of the Library 21Records Confidentiality Act (75 ILCS 70/1), shall not be 22considered public records once the information contained in 23the paper registration records is transferred into a secure 24electronic format and checked for accuracy. 25(Source: P.A. 99-147, eff. 1-1-16.) 26    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect January   SB0243 Enrolled- 59 -LRB104 07181 BDA 17218 b11, 2026.